District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0822.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Understanding the Cost of Housing Regulations Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Housing development cost review.
(a) The Mayor shall procure an independent third-party study of the District’s housing
development costs and regulatory environment.
(b) The study shall:
(1) Compare the District’s housing development costs and applicable regulations
with peer jurisdictions in Maryland, including Montgomery County, Prince George’s County,
Charles County, Calvert County, and Frederick County, and Arlington County, Alexandria,
Fairfax County, Loudoun County, and Prince William County in Virginia.
(2) Include a national peer set of comparable high-cost jurisdictions with a

rationale provided for inclusion;
(3) Measure, to the extent possible:
(A) Total development cost per housing unit;
(B) Soft costs and financing costs per housing unit;
(C) Median time from application to permit;
(D) Permitting and entitlement duration;
(E) Regulatory and development fees;
(F) Property taxes incurred during construction;
(G) Major District-specific compliance costs;
(H) Units permitted and completed; and
(I) Other costs or delays identified by the independent reviewer as
materially affecting housing production.
(c) The study shall identify specific laws, regulations, administrative requirements,
processes, or other governmental requirements that materially contribute to housing development
costs or permitting delays, and identify the approximate additional cost or delay associated with
each.
(d) The study shall identify whether a cost or delay is:
(1) Unique to the District;
(2) Materially greater in the District than in peer jurisdictions; and
(3) Supported by a demonstrated public benefit sufficient to justify the
identified cost or delay.
(e) The study shall make recommendations on how to modify or alter the identified laws,
regulations, administrative requirements, processes, or other governmental requirements in

subsection (c) to reduce costs on housing development.
(f) Within 30 days after completion of the study required by section 2, the Mayor shall
transmit the study to the Council.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.